South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5095.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 55, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 25 Urinary Metabolite Testing Section 44-55-2510.  (A) The Department of Environmental Services, or "department," shall conduct quarterly testing for the urinary metabolites in wastewater treatment facility intakes and outflows as described in this section. Tests conducted pursuant to this section must be performed by an accredited or certified environmental testing laboratory. (B) The department shall conduct testing for the following urinary metabolites in the form of gluconates for the purpose of protecting water quality, assessing risks to human health, evaluating impacts on aquatic life, and informing any necessary remediation or wastewater treatment requirements: (1) antimetabolites; (2) prostaglandins and prostaglandin analogs; and (3) antiprogestins. (C)(1) The department shall conduct the testing at wastewater treatment facilities as follows: (a) each wastewater treatment facility located within ten miles of a municipality with a population of 250,000 or more; and (b) at least ten wastewater treatment facilities located within ten miles of a municipality: (i) with a population of 100,000 or more but less than 250,000; (ii) with a population of 25,000 or more but less than 100,000; and (iii) with a population of less than 25,000. (2) In selecting wastewater treatment facilities described in item (1)(b), the department shall prioritize facilities that reasonably represent typical wastewater systems of municipalities with those population categories. (D) The department shall maintain detailed records of all testing conducted under this section and publish the records on the department's internet website and shall include with such publication a statement describing the public health or environmental relevance of the levels detected under applicable federal or state standards or departmental guidance. The records must include: (1) the date on which each sample was collected; (2) the location from which each sample was collected; (3) the date on which each sample was tested for the presence of the urinary metabolites listed in subsection (B); and (4) the results of the test for each urinary metabolite listed in subsection (B) in parts per trillion. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----